Vermont, session 2025-2026, S175.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 913 is added to read:
§ 913. CLIMATE CHANGE CURRICULUM
The Secretary shall develop or adopt an open source, accessible, and
interdisciplinary climate change curriculum for elementary and secondary
schools consistent with the findings of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate
Change’s 2023 synthesis report. The Secretary shall build upon existing
VT LEG #385085 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.175
2026 Page 2 of 2
resources in creating the curriculum to enable teaching about climate change
across subject areas.
Sec. 2. EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS
On or before July 1, 2027, and in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the
State Board of Education shall amend the Agency of Education, State Board
Rule 2000 Education Quality Standards (CVR 22-000-003) to require
supervisory-union-wide curricula to incorporate environmental and climate
change education at all grade levels, consistent with the curriculum developed
by the Secretary of Education pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 913.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385085 v.2